Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3522
Compact; withdrawal.

The State of Nebraska hereby withdraws from the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact. The Governor shall notify in writing each of the governors of the other compact states and the chairperson of the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact Commission that the withdrawal of the State of Nebraska from the compact is effective.

Laws 1999, LB 530, § 1.